Alabama, session 2026rs, SB60.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. (a) The Department of Corrections shall
check the database maintained by the National Crime
Information Center for any outstanding warrants issued for an
inmate at each of the following points:
(1) During the intake process.
(2) Upon consideration of the inmate for any work
release program.
(3) Prior to the release of the inmate into the
supervision of the Board of Pardons and Paroles.
(4) If the inmate is still in the custody of the
department, 90 days prior to the inmate's release at the end
of his or her sentence.
(b) When a search required by subsection (a) indicates
that an outstanding warrant exists, the department shall
notify the issuing court, agency, district attorney, or
municipal prosecutor as to the whereabouts of the inmate.
(c) The department shall cooperate as necessary to
ensure that any outstanding warrant for an inmate in its
physical custody is served.
(d) In the event it is technically possible, the
department shall cooperate so that any hearing required from
Page 2

department shall cooperate so that any hearing required from
SB60 INTRODUCED
the service of an arrest warrant under this section shall be
held pursuant to Section 15-26-1, Code of Alabama 1975, and
the inmate shall not be required to be physically brought
before the judge or magistrate.
(e) Nothing in this section shall require the
department to transport an inmate for any proceeding required
as a result of a warrant served while the inmate is in the
custody of the department.
Section 2. (a) The Board of Pardons and Paroles shall
check the database maintained by the National Crime
Information Center for any outstanding warrants issued for an
inmate when an inmate is considered for parole.
(b) When a search required by subsection (a) indicates
that an outstanding warrant exists, the board shall notify the
issuing court, agency, district attorney, or municipal
prosecutor as to the whereabouts of the inmate.
Section 3. This act shall become effective on January
1, 2027.
Page 3